Massachusetts, session 194th, S1880.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8 of chapter 32A of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the word “seventy-five”, in line 6, and
inserting in place thereof the following word:- eighty.
SECTION 2. Said section 8 of said chapter 32A, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out the word “seventy-five”, in line 12, and inserting in place thereof the
following word:- eighty.
of 1